Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1024.6 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. "Adult performance" means any performance that contains
obscene material, if done in view of a minor or in a public place;
2. "Obscene material" shall have the same meaning as such term
is defined in subsection B of Section 1024.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
3. "Minor" means an unmarried person under eighteen (18) years
of age; and
4. "Public place" means any area or space that the general
public may freely access without payment for admission; provided,

however, any place that limits access pursuant to an admissions
process or that restricts minors from entering the area or space to
participate or take part in any event shall be exempt from the
provisions of this section.
B. 1. It shall be unlawful for a person to engage in an adult
performance which contains obscene material, or for any political
subdivision of this state to allow, permit, organize, or authorize
the viewing of an adult performance which contains obscene material,
on public property or in a public place where a minor, as part of
the general public, will be exposed to view such adult performance.
2. A political subdivision acting in good faith in accordance
with the requirements of this subsection shall not be liable for the
acts of an individual or group in violation of this subsection.
C. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection B of
this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding
one (1) year, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00) and not exceeding One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by
both such fine and imprisonment.
D. The provisions of this section shall preempt any ordinance,
regulation, or restriction that was lawfully adopted or license that
was issued by a political subdivision of this state prior to the
effective date of this act that is in conflict with the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1217 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1217 Page 3